Indiana, session 2026, HB1190.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 5-10-15-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.109-2015,
SECTION 21, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), this
chapter does not apply to an individual who, at any time during the
individual's employment by the state or a political subdivision of the
state as:
(1) a member of a fire department (as defined in IC 36-8-1-8);
(2) an emergency medical services provider (as defined in
IC 16-41-10-1); or
(3) a member of a police department (as defined in IC 36-8-1-9);
used tobacco products in any form in the five (5) years before the time
the individual is diagnosed under section 9(a) of this chapter.
(b) This chapter applies to an individual notwithstanding the use
of tobacco products as described in subsection (a) if the individual
is diagnosed with a PFAS exposure related health condition that
would otherwise qualify the individual for a presumption of
disability under section 9 of this chapter.
2026 IN 1190—LS 6673/DI 153


SECTION 2. IC 5-10-15-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.170-2022,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), as
used in this chapter, "employee" means an individual who:
(1) is employed full time by the state or a political subdivision of
the state as:
(A) a member of a fire department (as defined in IC 36-8-1-8);
(B) an emergency medical services provider (as defined in
IC 16-41-10-1);
(C) a member of a police department (as defined in
IC 36-8-1-9); or
(D) a department of homeland security fire investigator;
(2) in the course of the individual's employment, is at risk for
occupational exposure; and
(3) is not employed elsewhere by the state or a political
subdivision of the state in a similar capacity.
(b) As used in this chapter, "employee", with respect to a PFAS
exposure related health condition, means an individual who:
(1) is employed full time by the state or a political subdivision
of the state as a member of a fire department (as defined in
IC 36-8-1-8);
(2) in the course of the individual's employment, is at risk for
occupational exposure; and
(3) is not employed elsewhere by the state or a political
subdivision of the state in a similar capacity.
SECTION 3. IC 5-10-15-6.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 6.5. As used in this chapter, "PFAS chemical" means
any chemical of a class of fluorinated organic chemicals, including:
(1) perfluoroalkyl substances; and
(2) polyfluoroalkyl substances;
that contains at least one (1) fully fluorinated carbon atom.
SECTION 4. IC 5-10-15-6.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 6.7. As used in this chapter, "PFAS exposure related
health condition" refers to a health condition that is caused by a
PFAS chemical to which an individual is at risk for occupational
exposure.
SECTION 5. IC 5-10-15-9, AS AMENDED BY P.L.59-2009,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. (a) An employee or former employee who:
(1) is diagnosed with an exposure related cancer, exposure related
2026 IN 1190—LS 6673/DI 153


heart or lung disease, or exposure related Parkinson's disease, or
PFAS exposure related health condition that:
(A) requires medical treatment; or
(B) results in total or partial disability; and
(2) at the time of the diagnosis:
(A) is actively employed; or
(B) has terminated employment not more than sixty (60)
months earlier;
is presumed to have a disability incurred in the line of duty.
(b) The presumption described in subsection (a) may be rebutted by
competent evidence.
(c) A meeting or hearing held to rebut the presumption described in
subsection (a) may be held as an executive session under
IC 5-14-1.5-6.1(b)(1).
SECTION 6. IC 36-8-8-12.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.54-2020,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12.5. (a) This section applies only to a fund
member who:
(1) is hired for the first time after December 31, 1989;
(2) chooses coverage by this section and section 13.5 of this
chapter under section 12.4 of this chapter; or
(3) is described in section 12.3(c)(2) of this chapter.
(b) At the same hearing where the determination of whether the
fund member has a covered impairment is made, the local board shall
determine the following:
(1) Whether the fund member has a Class 1 impairment. A Class
1 impairment is a covered impairment that is the direct result of
one (1) or more of the following:
(A) A personal injury that occurs while the fund member is on
duty.
(B) A personal injury that occurs while the fund member is off
duty and is responding to:
(i) an offense or a reported offense, in the case of a police
officer; or
(ii) an emergency or reported emergency for which the fund
member is trained, in the case of a firefighter.
(C) An occupational disease (as defined in IC 22-3-7-10). A
covered impairment that is included within this clause and
subdivision (2), including mental illnesses, shall be considered
a Class 1 impairment.
(D) A health condition caused by an exposure risk disease that
results in a presumption of disability or death incurred in the
2026 IN 1190—LS 6673/DI 153


line of duty under IC 5-10-13.
(2) Whether the fund member has a Class 2 impairment. A Class
2 impairment is a covered impairment that is:
(A) a duty related disease. A duty related disease means a
disease arising out of the fund member's employment. A
disease shall be considered to arise out of the fund member's
employment if it is apparent to the rational mind, upon
consideration of all of the circumstances, that:
(i) there is a connection between the conditions under which
the fund member's duties are performed and the disease;
(ii) the disease can be seen to have followed as a natural
incident of the fund member's duties as a result of the
exposure occasioned by the nature of the fund member's
duties; and
(iii) the disease can be traced to the fund member's
employment as the proximate cause; or
(B) a health condition caused by:
(i) an exposure related heart or lung disease;
(ii) an exposure related cancer; or
(iii) exposure related Parkinson's disease;
that results in a presumption of disability incurred in the line
of duty under IC 5-10-15.
(3) Whether the fund member has a Class 3 impairment. A Class
3 impairment is a covered impairment that is not a Class 1
impairment or a Class 2 impairment.
2026 IN 1190—LS 6673/DI 153